Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,294
Use of pseudonym.

In any action
brought pursuant to the Exploited Children's Civil Remedy Act, a plaintiff
may request to use a pseudonym instead of his or her legal name in all court
proceedings and records. Upon finding that the use of a pseudonym is proper,
the court shall ensure that the pseudonym is used in all court proceedings
and records.

Laws 2010, LB728, § 5.